Oklahoma, session 2025, SB896.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 328 of Title 75, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. 1. Any permanent rule promulgated or otherwise in effect on
or after the effective date of this act shall automatically
terminate pursuant to the schedule prescribed in paragraph 2 of this
subsection.
2. The Secretary of State shall develop a schedule, subject to
approval by the President Pro Tempore of the State Senate, the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Administrative
Rules Committee chairs of both houses, for the initial expiration of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB896 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the administrative rules of each state agency. The schedule shall
prescribe twenty percent (20%) of state agencies per calendar year
whose rules shall expire. The schedule shall be devised as follows:
a. the first twenty percent (20%) of agency rules shall
initially expire on February 1, 2026,
b. the second twenty percent (20%) of agency rules shall
initially expire on February 1, 2027,
c. the third twenty percent (20%) of agency rules shall
initially expire on February 1, 2028,
d. the fourth twenty percent (20%) of agency rules shall
initially expire on February 1, 2029, and
e. the fifth and final twenty percent (20%) of agency
rules shall initially expire on February 1, 2030.
B. A rule subject to termination under this section may be
renewed for additional terms of five (5) years, or less, by the
Legislature by approval and enactment of a joint resolution.
C. Nothing in this section shall preclude the ability of the
Legislature to repeal a permanent rule prior to the automatic
termination of the rule under this section.
D. An agency may request the renewal by the Legislature of a
rule subject to automatic termination under this section. The
request shall be submitted no less than one (1) year, and no more
than two (2) years, prior to the date that the rule is set to
terminate. The agency shall demonstrate why renewal of the rule is
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB896 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

nece ssary and shall include a cost-benefit analysis. The agency
shall also publish the request on its website.
E. 1. Except for rules expiring pursuant to subparagraph a of
paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section, the Secretary of State
shall provide notice to the promulgating agency at least eighteen
(18) months prior to every rule’s termination date. Agencies with
rules expiring under subparagraph a of paragraph 2 of subsection A
of this section shall be provided notice not later than sixty (60)
days after the effective date of this act.
2. Lack of notice under this subsection shall not prevent
expiration of any rules under an agency’s purview.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ADMINISTRATIVE RULES
February 13, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB896 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)